Utah statutes.
32B-5-202.   Renewal requirements.

(1)  A retail license expires each year on the day specified in the relevant part under Chapter 6, Specific Retail License Act, for that type of retail license.

(2)  To renew a person's retail license, a retail licensee shall, by no later than the day specified in the relevant part under Chapter 6, Specific Retail License Act, for the type of retail license that is being renewed, submit:

(a)  a completed renewal application to the department in a form prescribed by the department; and

(b)  a renewal fee in the amount specified in the relevant part under Chapter 6, Specific Retail License Act, for the type of retail license that is being renewed.

(3)  Failure to meet the renewal requirements results in an automatic forfeiture of the retail license effective on the date the existing retail license expires.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

